en: kaffir lime leaf, kaffir lime leaves
de: Kaffirlimettenblatt, Kaffirlimettenblätter, Kaffir limettenblätter, Kaffernlimettenblätter
fi: kaffirlimetinlehti, kaffirlimenlehti
fr: feuilles de combava, feuilles de lime kaffir
hr: list kafirske limete
it: foglia di lime kaffir
pl: liście kaffiru, liście limonki kaffir

en: kaffir lime peel
de: Kaffirlimettenschale, Kaffirlimettenschalen, Kaffernlimettenschale
es: piel de lima Kaffir
hr: kora kafirske limete
it: buccia di lime kaffir
sv: kaffir limeskal

en: bergamot
fr: bergamote

en: bergamot leaf, bergamot leaves
it: foglia di bergamotto

en: bergamot flower
fr: fleur de bergamote, fleurs de bergamote
it: fiore di bergamotto

en: kumquat, kumquats
af: koemkwat
ar: كمكوات
az: kinkan
bg: кумкуат
ca: cumquat
cs: kumquat
cv: кумкват
da: kumquat
de: Kumquat
el: κουμκουάτ
eo: kumkvato
es: kumquat, cumquat
et: kinkan
eu: kumkuat
fa: پورنج
fi: kumkvatti, kumkvatit, kääpiöpomeranssi
fr: kumquat
gl: kumquat
he: קומקוואט
hr: kumkvat
hu: kumkvat
id: kumkuat
is: kúmkvat
it: kumquat
ja: キンカン
ka: კინკანი
ko: 금귤
kv: кумкват
la: citrus japonica
lt: kinkanas
ml: കുംകാറ്റ് ഓറഞ്ച്
ms: kumkuat, كومكوات‎
nb: kumquat
ne: मुन्तला
nl: kumquat
nn: kumquat
pl: kumkwat
pt: cunquate, quincã
ro: kumquat
ru: кумкват
sk: kumkvat
sl: kumkvat
sr: кумкват, kumkvat
sv: kumquat
th: ส้มจี๊ด
tl: kumquat
to: kamikuati
tr: kamkat
uk: кумкват
vi: quất
zh: 金橘

en: kumquat juice
de: Kumquat-Saft
es: jugo de kumquat
fr: jus de kumquat
hr: sok od kumkvata
it: succo di kumquat
ja: 金柑ジュース
nl: kumquat sap
pt: suco de kumquat, sumo de kumquat

en: citron
ar: أترجة
ca: poncem
da: cedrat
de: Zitronatzitrone
eu: zidra
fr: cédrat
it: cedro
ja: シトロン
la: Citrus medica
nb: sukatsitron
nn: sukatsitron
ru: цитрон
sl: citrona
sv: suckatcitron, cedrat
uk: цитрон

en: citron extract
it: estratto di cedro

en: chinotto, citrus myrtifolia
it: chinotto, citrus myrtifolia

en: chinotto extract
it: estratto di chinotto

en: lemon
an: limón
ar: ليمون
az: limon
be: лімон
bg: лимон
bi: lemon
br: sitroñs
ca: llimona
cs: citron
da: citron, citroner
de: Zitrone, Zitronen
el: λεμόνι
eo: citrono
es: limón, limones
et: sidrun
eu: limoi
fi: sitruuna, sitruunaa
fr: citron, citrons, citron jaune, citrons jaunes
fy: sitroen
gl: limón
he: לימון
hr: limun, limuna, ploda limuna, citrus limon
ht: sitron
hu: citrom
hy: լիմոն
id: lemon
it: limone, limoni
ja: レモン
ka: ლიმონი
kg: dilala ya ngayi
ko: 레몬
la: citrus × limon
mg: voasarimakirana
mi: rēmana
mk: лимон
ml: ചെറുനാരങ്ങ
mn: нимбэг
mr: लिंबू
mt: lumija
my: သံပယိုသီး
nb: sitron
ne: कागती
nl: citroen
nn: sitron
nv: chʼil łitsooí díkʼǫ́zhígíí
oc: citron
or: ଲେମ୍ବୂ
pl: cytryna, cytryny, cytryn, cytrynowa, cytrynowy, cytrynowe
ps: ليمو
pt: limão
ro: lămâie, lamaie
ru: лимон
sc: limone
sk: citrón
sl: limona
sq: limon
sv: citron, citron frukt, citroner
sw: limau
tg: лимӯ
tr: limon
tt: лимун
uk: лимон
uz: limon
wa: limon
za: makningzmungx
zh: 柠檬, 檸檬

en: lemon peel, lemon rind
ca: pell de llimona
cs: citrónová kůra
da: citronskal
de: Zitronenschalen, Zitronenschale
es: cáscara de limón
fi: sitruunankuori
fr: écorce de citron, écorces de citron, écorces de citrons
hr: limunova korica
nl: citroenschil, schillen citroen
nn: citronskal
pl: skórka cytryny, skórka z cytryny, skórka cytrynowa
pt: casca de limão
ro: coajă de lămâie
sv: citronskal

en: lemon peel extract
da: citronskalextract
fi: sitruunankuoriuute
hr: ekstrakt kore limuna
nl: citroenschilextract
nn: citronskalextract
ro: extract de coaja de lamaie
sv: citronskalextract

en: lemon zest
de: Zitronenzeste, Zitronenabrieb
es: ralladura de limón
fr: zestes de citron, zeste de citron
hr: korica limuna
it: scorza di limone
nl: citroenrasp, geraspte citroenschil, citroenzest
ru: цедра лимона
sv: citronzest

en: powdered lemon zest
hr: limunova korica u prahu
it: scorza di limone in polvere

en: lemon leaf, lemon leaves
de: Zitronenblatt
es: hoja limón
fr: feuille de citron
hr: list limuna
it: foglia di limone
nl: citroenblad

en: lemon pulp
bg: пулпа от лимон
de: Zitronenpulpe
es: pulpa de limón
fi: sitruunan hedelmäliha
fr: pulpe de citron, pulpes de citron
hr: pulpa limuna
it: polpa di limone
nl: citroenpulp
pt: polpa de limão

en: lemon puree, lemon purée
bg: пюре от лимони
de: Zitronenmark
es: puré de limon
fi: sitruunapyree
fr: purée de citron
hr: pire od limuna
it: purea di limone
nl: citroenpuree, puree van citroen
pt: puré de limão

fr: purée de citron sucrée
nl: gesuikerde citroenpuree